Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7552.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 11-42-4 of the General Laws in Chapter 11-42 entitled "Threats and
Extortion" is hereby amended to read as follows:
11-42-4. Threats to public officials.
(a) Whoever knowingly and willfully delivers or conveys, directly or indirectly, a verbal
or written threat to take the life of, or to inflict bodily harm upon, a public official or a member of
a public official’s immediate family because of the performance or nonperformance of some public
duty; because of hostility of the person making the threat toward the status or position of the public
official; or because of some other factor related to the official’s public existence, shall be guilty of
a felony and shall be imprisoned for not more than five (5) years, or fined not more than five
thousand dollars ($5,000), or both.
(b) Whoever knowingly and willfully delivers or conveys, directly or indirectly, a verbal
or written threat to take the life of, or to inflict bodily harm upon, any election official, or a member
of their immediate family because of the performance or nonperformance of their public duty;
because of hostility of the person making the threat toward the status or position of the election
official; or because of some other factor related to the election official’s public existence, shall be
guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be imprisoned for not more than one year, or fined not more than
one thousand dollars ($1,000), or both.
(c) For purposes of this section:
(1) “Public official” means a person who is elected or appointed to office in accordance

with the constitution, a statute, or a city or town charter, or who is a judge, magistrate, assistant
attorney general, special assistant attorney general, or law enforcement officer, or in the case of
schools, a school superintendent, central office official, school principal, and all other school
employees or in the case of an elective office, any person who has filed the required documents for
nomination or election to that office or who is appointed by the governor to serve as the director or
their designee of a state department that is established and the qualifications and duties of which
are prescribed by statute to discharge a public duty for the state of Rhode Island;
(2) “Election official” means a person who is appointed, hired, or assigned to any polling
place and includes, but is not limited to, any poll worker, election worker, warden, moderator, clerk,
and any member of the board of canvassers, in accordance with any statute, town charter, or
ordinance and whose qualifications and duties are prescribed by statute, town charter, or ordinance;
(3) “Immediate family” means a public official’s spouse, child, or children.
(4) In the case of schools, a school superintendent, central office official, school principal,
and all other school employees, a suspect shall be charged under this section only if the suspect is
eighteen (18) years of age or older or is otherwise considered a legal adult.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC004374
========
LC004374 - Page 2 of 3